Massachusetts, session 194th, S196.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 173 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Certified appraisal or
certified appraisal report” the following definition:-
“Evaluation”, an estimate of the value of real property, made in accordance with the
Interagency Appraisal and Evaluation Guidelines, for use in a real estate-related financial
transaction for which an appraisal is not required by federal law.
SECTION 2. Subsection A of section 174 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:-
of 2

Except to the extent permitted under subsections B and C, a person who has not obtained
a real estate appraisal license or certification under this chapter shall not prepare, for a fee or
other consideration, an appraisal or appraisal report relating to real estate or real property in the
commonwealth.
SECTION 3. Said section 174 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out subsection C and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
C. Sections 173 to 195, inclusive, shall not apply to a person engaged by a financial
institution to perform an evaluation. When providing an evaluation, a licensed or certified real
estate appraiser is not required to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal
Practice. An evaluation by a real estate appraiser who is licensed or certified in the
commonwealth under this subsection shall contain a disclosure that the evaluation is not an
appraisal and is not required to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal
Practice.
of 2